Hawaii statutes.
§46-63 Gift or sale of county property for
care of aged persons. The several counties may give, sell, set aside, and
transfer property, real or personal, to private eleemosynary organizations
dedicated to the care of aged persons, so long as it is used for the care of
aged persons. [L 1963, c 122, §1; Supp, §138-53; HRS §46-63]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next